Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Refunds of Taxes and License Fees.

Collateral references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 515-518.

85 C.J.S., Taxation, §§ 907-972.

Right to interest on tax refunds in absence of specific controlling statute.
88 ALR2d 823.

Right of taxpayer to recover back taxes voluntarily but mistakenly paid a second or successive time. 84 ALR2d 1133.

Liability of executor or administrator to estate because of overpaying or unnecessarily paying tax. 55 ALR3d 785.

Refund of state inheritance or estate tax where claims are proven against estate after tax was paid. 63 ALR3d 924.

Right of surviving spouse to tax refund resulting from joint income tax return. 67 ALR3d 1038.

Construction, and application of “pay-all-taxes” provision in will, as including liability of nontestamentary property for inheritance and estate taxes. 56 ALR5th 133.

Standing of one taxpayer to complain of underassessment or nonassessment of property of another for state and local taxation. 9 ALR4th 428.

Propriety of class action in state courts to recover taxes. 10 ALR4th 655.

Estoppel of state or local government in tax matters. 21 ALR4th 573.

Liability to refund local taxes as within coverage of liability insurance. 21 ALR4th 895.

Recovery of tax paid on exempt property. 25 ALR4th 186.

Sec. 43.10.210.
Recovery of overpayments and protested payments.

The Department of Administration shall, with the approval of the attorney general and the Department of Revenue, refund to a taxpayer the amount of a tax paid to the Department of Revenue under protest and deposited in the treasury if

the taxpayer recovers judgment against the Department of Revenue for the return of the tax; or

in the absence of a judgment, it is obvious to the Department of Revenue that the taxpayer would obtain judgment if legal proceedings were prosecuted by the taxpayer.

The Department of Administration shall refund the amount of an overpayment to a taxpayer if the Department of Revenue, on audit of the account in question, determines that a remittance by the taxpayer exceeds the amount due.

If the department and the attorney general determine that a licensee has paid a license tax and is prevented from using the license by court order, administrative decision, or other cause beyond the control of the taxpayer, the Department of Administration shall refund the amount of the license tax to the licensee.

History.

(§ 48-7-1 ACLA 1949; am E.O. No. 68, § 4 (1988))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 43.15.010. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.